Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 3. District Commissioners Generally
§ 41-7-315.
Sale of water rights.

Whenever any of the lands embraced within said district have been or are to be reclaimed by the work done or proposed to be done by said district and the segregation of said lands has been secured by said district, it shall be competent for the commissioners of said district, in the name of said district, to contract with any person competent to make entry upon said lands for the sale of water rights thereto, and any and all payments by such contracts provided to be paid to the district shall be and are a lien upon said lands and water rights until paid, and such lien may be foreclosed in the manner provided by law for the foreclosure of such liens.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 40; C.S. 1920, § 974; R.S. 1931, § 122-725; C.S. 1945, § 71-825; W.S. 1957, § 41-297.

Cross references. —

As to enforcement of judgments generally, see §§

1-17-101

through

1-17-707

.

As to sale and redemption of realty sold under mortgage or execution, see §§

1-18-101

through

1-18-112

.

§ 41-7-316.
Election; when held; term of office; exception.

At any annual meeting of the irrigation district, the district may elect to adopt either a calendar year basis for their district elections or a fiscal year basis for their district elections. If the district elects a calendar year basis, on or after the first day of February and before the last day in March next preceding the expiration of the terms of office of any irrigation district commissioner appointed in any irrigation district, organized under the provisions of this chapter, and on or after the first day of February and before the last day in March of each year thereafter, an election shall be held to elect a commissioner or commissioners for the district, in the manner prescribed by this section.

If the district elects a fiscal year basis for their district elections similar to that of the county in which they are located, then on or after the first day of August and before the last day of September next preceding the expiration of the terms of office of any irrigation district commissioner appointed or elected in any irrigation district organized under the provisions of this chapter, and on or after the first day of August and before the last day in September of each year thereafter, an election shall be held to elect a commissioner or commissioners for the district, in the manner prescribed in this section.

At the first election held in any district, one (1) commissioner shall be elected from each commissioner district who shall be a landowner thereof. Where the irrigation district is divided into three (3) subdivisions, the commissioner from district number 1 shall serve as a commissioner for a term of one (1) year, the commissioner from district number 2 shall serve as a commissioner for a term of two (2) years, and the commissioner from district number 3 shall serve as a commissioner for a term of three (3) years. Where the district is divided into five (5) subdivisions, the commissioners from districts numbers 1 and 2 shall serve as commissioners for a term of one (1) year, commissioners from districts numbers 3 and 4 shall serve as commissioners for a term of two (2) years, and the commissioner from district number 5 shall serve as a commissioner for a term of three (3) years. Thereafter, all commissioners elected shall serve for a term of three (3) years, and until their successors are elected and qualified, except commissioners elected to fill an unexpired term.

The term of an elected commissioner shall commence upon the date of the next regular meeting of the commissioners held after his election. If a majority of the commissioners are appointed by the secretary of the interior as provided for in this chapter, then the remaining commissioners shall be elected at large within the entire irrigation district for terms of three (3) years each. The terms however, shall be limited to and expire on the date of the next regular meeting of the commissioners held following the date when the unentered public lands within the district constitute less than the majority of the total acreage within the district. After the expiration of these terms, the commissioners shall be elected in the same manner and for the same terms as provided for herein in the case of first election of commissioners.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 58, 59; C.S. 1920, § 992; Laws 1923, ch. 91, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 122-743; Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 1; 1943, ch. 17, § 1; 1943, ch. 82, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-843; Laws 1955, ch. 47, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-298; Laws 1975, ch. 2, § 1; 1995, ch. 151, § 1.

Cross references. —

See also §

41-7-302

. As to original appointment, etc., of commissioners, see §

41-7-210

.

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926).

§ 41-7-317.
Election; where held; notice to voters; qualifications of voters; recording vote; proxies.

The commissioners of the district shall fix the hour and place, within the boundaries of or at a place convenient to the landowners within the irrigation district, of each election and preside at the same. It shall be the duty of the commissioners, at least twenty (20) days prior to the date of an election, to mail to each person or corporation entitled to vote thereat, at his or its last known place of residence or business, a notice stating the time, place and purpose of such elections. Every person or corporation owning or entitled by virtue of public land filing to the possession of land situated within and being a part of any commissioner district in which an election for commissioner is being held, and upon which land no assessment for operation, maintenance or repairs is delinquent for more than four (4) years, shall be entitled to cast, for the commissioner to be elected, for the commissioner district wherein such land is situated, one (1) vote for each irrigable acre of such land assessed upon the last annual assessment of said district upon or against which land no assessment for operation, maintenance or repairs is delinquent for more than four (4) years. At the hour and place of such election the commissioners shall call the roll of those entitled to vote, and the number of votes each is entitled to cast. They shall make a record of the qualified voters present, receive all proxies and prescribe the manner of canvassing votes. All proxies shall be in writing and signed by the person or corporation entitled to vote.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 60 to 63; C.S. 1920, § 993; R.S. 1931, § 122-744; Laws 1939, ch. 8, § 1; 1941, ch. 103, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-844; Laws 1955, ch. 46, § 1; 1957, ch. 31, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-299.

Meaning of “irrigable land.” —

Abstractly speaking “irrigable land” is land which is suitable for irrigation, but concretely speaking it implies that there must be water available by which the land may be irrigated. Biddick v. Laramie Valley Mun. Irrigation Dist., 76 Wyo. 67, 299 P.2d 1059,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1956).

Apportionment of votes. —

This section should be interpreted to mean that the owner of each acre of land assessed the maximum amount for the prior year should be allowed 1 vote, and the owner of each acre of land assessed a lesser amount should have a fraction of a vote based upon the relation his assessment for the prior year bears to the maximum assessment. Biddick v. Laramie Valley Mun. Irrigation Dist., 76 Wyo. 67, 299 P.2d 1059,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1956).

§ 41-7-318.
Election; validity; qualifications of candidates; vacancies in office; duties of elected commissioners.

No person shall be declared elected as a commissioner who shall not be a landowner in said commissioner district and who shall not have received a majority of all votes cast by the qualified voters of said commissioner district. No election shall be invalid by reason of the fact that a majority of the acreage within the district was not represented at such election. Whenever the office of any elected commissioner shall become vacant by reason of death, resignation or other cause, the vacancy shall be filled by the surviving commissioners for the unexpired term. In case such vacancy is not so filled within thirty (30) days, the court shall fill such vacancy. All elected commissioners shall have the same qualifications and duties as herein prescribed for appointed or elected commissioners.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 64 to 66; C.S. 1920, § 994; R.S. 1931, § 122-745; C.S. 1945, § 71-845; Laws 1955, ch. 174, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-300.

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926).